Maryland, session 2025, HB0915.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 8–1006 and 8–1007 of Article – Transportation of the Annotated Code of
Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 8–1007 and 8–1008, respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Transportation
8–1006.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO COUNTY AND MUNICIPAL AUTOMATED
TRAFFIC ENFORCEMENT PROGRAMS THAT IMPLEMENT:
(1) TRAFFIC CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEMS UNDER §
21–202.1 OF THIS ARTICLE;

HOUSE BILL 915 3
(2) AUTOMATED RAILROAD GRADE CROSSING ENFORCEMENT
SYSTEMS UNDER § 21–704.1 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(3) SCHOOL BUS MONITORING CAMERAS UNDER § 21–706.1 OF THIS
ARTICLE;
(4) STOP SIGN MONITORING SYSTEMS UNDER § 21–707.1 OF THIS
ARTICLE;
(5) SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS UNDER § 21–809 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(6) WORK ZONE SPEED CONTROL SYSTEMS UNDER § 21–810 OF THIS
ARTICLE;
(7) BUS LANE MONITORING SYSTEMS UNDER § 21–1134 OF THIS
ARTICLE;
(8) NOISE ABATEMENT MONITORING SYSTEMS UNDER § 22–612 OF
THIS ARTICLE;
(9) VEHICLE HEIGHT MONITORING SYSTEMS UNDER § 24–111.3 OF
THIS ARTICLE; OR
(10) ANY OTHER COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL AUTOMATED TRAFFIC
ENFORCEMENT SYSTEM AUTHORIZED UNDER STATE LAW.
(B) EACH COUNTY AND MUNICIPAL AUTOMATED TRAFFIC ENFORCEMENT
PROGRAM SHALL SUBMIT A QUARTERLY REPORT TO THE COORDINATOR STATING,
FOR EACH CITATION ISSUED DURING THE APPLICABLE QUARTER TO A MOTOR
VEHICLE REGISTERED IN ANOTHER STATE:
(1) THE REGISTRATION PLATE NUMBER AND STATE OF
REGISTRATION;
(2) WHETHER THE CITATION HAS BEEN PAID; AND
(3) WHETHER THE CITATION IS PAST DUE.
(C) EACH QUARTERLY REPORT SHALL:
(1) INCLUDE THE INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)
OF THIS SECTION FOR THE PREVIOUS QUARTER;

HOUSE BILL 915
(2) UPDATE THE INFORMATION PROVIDED IN PREVIOUS QUARTERLY
REPORTS TO REFLECT CITATIONS THAT HAVE BEEN SUBSEQUENTLY PAID AND ARE
NO LONGER CONSIDERED PAST DUE; AND
(3) PROVIDE A CUMULATIVE SUMMARY OF:
(I) CITATIONS ISSUED UNDER THE PROGRAM TO MOTOR
VEHICLES REGISTERED IN ANOTHER STATE;
(II) THE NUMBER OF CITATIONS THAT HAVE BEEN PAID; AND
(III) THE NUMBER OF CITATIONS THAT ARE PAST DUE.
(D) THE COORDINATOR SHALL COLLABORATE WITH COUNTY AND
MUNICIPAL AUTOMATED TRAFFIC ENFORCEMENT PROGRAMS TO IMPLEMENT THIS
SECTION.
26–205.
(A) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL OR THE APPROPRIATE LOCAL STATE’S
ATTORNEY MAY BRING A CIVIL ACTION IN THE APPROPRIATE COURT FOR THE
PAYMENT OF AN UNPAID AND OVERDUE TRAFFIC CITATION, INCLUDING TRAFFIC
CITATIONS ISSUED UNDER AN AUTOMATED ENFORCEMENT PROGRAM, AGAINST:
(1) A RESIDENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA WHO IS THE DRIVER
OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE THAT WAS INVOLVED IN THE TRAFFIC VIOLATION THAT LED
TO THE CITATION;
(2) A RESIDENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA TO WHOM THE
MOTOR VEHICLE THAT WAS INVOLVED IN THE TRAFFIC VIOLATION THAT LED TO THE
CITATION IS REGISTERED; OR
(3) A MOTOR VEHICLE REGISTERED IN THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
THAT WAS INVOLVED IN THE TRAFFIC VIOLATION THAT LED TO THE CITATION.
(B) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL OR THE APPROPRIATE LOCAL STATE’S
ATTORNEY MAY NOT BRING A CIVIL ACTION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION FOR A TRAFFIC CITATION THAT:
(1) IS BEING CONTESTED OR APPEALED;
(2) IS NOT PAST ITS DUE DATE;
(3) HAS BEEN PAID; OR

HOUSE BILL 915 5
(4) IS SUBJECT TO AN INSTALLMENT PAYMENT PLAN THAT IS NOT IN
DEFAULT.
(C) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL OR THE APPROPRIATE LOCAL STATE’S
ATTORNEY MAY SEEK:
(1) PAYMENT OF ANY OUTSTANDING FINES FOR UNPAID AND
OVERDUE TRAFFIC CITATIONS;
(2) REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES;
(3) THE SUSPENSION OR REVOCATION OF THE DRIVER’S OR
REGISTERED OWNER’S PRIVILEGE TO DRIVE IN THE STATE; OR
(4) IMMOBILIZATION OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE THAT WAS INVOLVED
IN THE TRAFFIC VIOLATION THAT LED TO THE CITATION BY TOWING OR REMOVAL
AND IMPOUNDMENT, OR BOOTING.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.